Maine, session 132, LD819.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §691, sub-§1, ¶F, as amended by PL 2019, c. 659, Pt. B, §2, is
further amended by enacting after the first blocked paragraph a new paragraph to read:
"Qualified property" also includes a battery storage system, as long as more than 50%
of the electrical output from the battery storage system serves load behind the utility
meter where the battery storage system is located or there was a fully executed
interconnection agreement between the battery storage system owner and a
transmission and distribution utility by January 1, 2025. As used in this paragraph,
"battery storage system" means commercially available technology that uses
mechanical, chemical or thermal processes for absorbing energy and storing it for a
period of time for use at a later time, including, but not limited to, lithium-ion batteries.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §6652, sub-§1-F is enacted to read:
1-F. Energy storage systems. Reimbursement pursuant to this chapter may be made
for battery storage systems, as long as more than 50% of the electrical output from the
battery storage system serves load behind the utility meter where the battery storage system
is located or there was a fully executed interconnection agreement between the battery
storage system owner and a transmission and distribution utility by January 1, 2025. As
used in this subsection, "battery storage system" has the same meaning as in section 691,
subsection 1, paragraph F.
Sec. 3. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.
Page 1 - 132LR1020(03)